Utah statutes.
22-1-1.   Definitions.
In this chapter unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:
"Fiduciary" includes a trustee under any trust, expressed, implied, resulting
or constructive, executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, curator,
receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, assignee for the benefit of creditors,
partner, agent, officer of a corporation, public or private, public officer,
and any other person acting in a fiduciary capacity for any person, trust or
estate.
"Principal" includes any person to whom a fiduciary as such owes an
obligation.
A thing is done "in good faith" when it is in fact done honestly, whether it
is done negligently or not.
